Georgia, session 2025_26, HB593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
All elections for the office of probate judge of Baker County conducted after the effective
date of this Act shall be nonpartisan elections as provided for in Code Section 21-2-139 of
the O.C.G.A. Such nonpartisan elections shall be conducted at the general nonpartisan
election immediately preceding the expiration of the term of such office and conducted as
provided in Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the O.C.G.A., the "Georgia Election Code."
SECTION 2.
Nothing in this Act shall affect the term of office of the probate judge of Baker County in
office on the effective date of this Act. The sitting probate judge shall serve out the term of
office for which he or she was elected and shall be eligible to succeed himself or herself as
provided in this Act.
H. B. 593
- 1 -

LC 61 0119/AP
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 593
- 2 -